Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
183B]

HAWAIIAN
FISHPONDS

Section

183B-1 Definitions

183B-2 Exemption from environmental impact
statement law

183B-3 Department assistance

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next